Alaska, session 34, HB125.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 16.05.221(a) is amended to read: 05 (a) For purposes of the conservation and development of the fishery resources 06 of the state, there is created the Board of Fisheries composed of seven members 07 appointed by the governor, subject to confirmation by a majority of the members of 08 the legislature in joint session. The governor shall appoint each member on the basis 09 of interest in public affairs, good judgment, knowledge, and ability in the field of 10 action of the board, and with a view to providing diversity of interest and points of 11 view in the membership. The appointed members shall be residents of the state and 12 shall be appointed without regard to political affiliation or geographical location of 13 residence. The commissioner is not a member of the Board of Fisheries, but shall be 14 ex officio secretary. The governor shall appoint the members as follows: 01 (1) two members who represent commercial fishing and have 02 knowledge of and experience in the commercial fishing industry; 03 (2) two members who represent sport fishing and have knowledge 04 of and experience in sport fishing; 05 (3) two members who represent subsistence fishing and have 06 knowledge of and experience in subsistence fishing; 07 (4) one member of the scientific community who has knowledge of 08 and experience in fisheries management. 09 * Sec. 2. AS 16.05.940(32) is amended to read: 10 (32) "subsistence fishing" means the taking of, fishing for, or 11 possession of fish, shellfish, or other fisheries resources by a resident [DOMICILED 12 IN A RURAL AREA] of the state for subsistence uses with gill net, seine, fish wheel, 13 long line, or other means defined by the Board of Fisheries; 14 * Sec. 3. AS 16.05.940(34) is amended to read: 15 (34) "subsistence uses" means the noncommercial, customary and 16 traditional uses of wild, renewable resources by a resident [DOMICILED IN A 17 RURAL AREA] of the state for direct personal or family consumption as food, 18 shelter, fuel, clothing, tools, or transportation, for the making and selling of handicraft 19 articles out of nonedible by-products of fish and wildlife resources taken for personal 20 or family consumption, and for the customary trade, barter, or sharing for personal or 21 family consumption; in this paragraph, "family" means persons related by blood, 22 marriage, or adoption, and a person living in the household on a permanent basis; 23 * Sec. 4. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 24 read: 25 TRANSITION. A person who is a member of the Board of Fisheries on the day before 26 the effective date of this Act continues to serve until the expiration of the member's term. An 27 appointment for a vacancy that occurs on or after the effective date of this Act shall be in 28 accordance with AS 16.05.221(a), as amended by sec. 1 of this Act. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.